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1FZ−FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)

DTC 22 Both Fuel Pump Simultaneous Operation
Malfunction (*)

*: Fuel Tank Changeover Switch OFF

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 08.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Item Trouble Area

22

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF

(Voltage of FPMS terminal is low)
(b)VoltageofFPM 1 terminal ishigh
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is high

SShort insub fuel tank forcingdriving relaycircuit
SSub fuel tank forcingdriving relay
SShort insub fuelpumpcircuit (+Bshort)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI−1 08.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 CheckvoltagebetweenterminalFPM2ofengineECUconnectorandbody
ground (See page DI−11 6 , step 2).

OK Repair and replace harness and connector.

NG

2 Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI−52).

NGReplace subfuel tankforcingdrivingrelay.

OK
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3 Check voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch to START.
(c) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU con-
nector and body ground, 4 seconds or more after starting the
engine.
OK:

Voltage: 9 − 14 V

NG Go to step 4.

OK

Check and repair harness and connector between sub fuel pump and sub fuel tank forcing
driving relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN−1 9) .

4 Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .


